New Jersey, session 221, A3822.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A board of education shall not open the schools of the district on November 11th of each school year, in observance of Veterans Day. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment. STATEMENT Current law provides each board of education with the discretion to annually determine the dates between which the schools of the district will be open, in accordance with law. Current law does not require schools to be closed on any particular holiday. This bill prohibits a board of education from opening schools on November 11th of each school year, in observance of Veterans Day. It is the sponsors intent to ensure that New Jerseys young citizens are taught to honor our veterans, who have so bravely served our country and who did not hesitate to answer when their nation called on them. Closing the schools on Veterans Day will appropriately signal to students the importance of the holiday.